Washington statutes.
RCW 39.42.150

Liquefied natural gas used as marine vessel transportation fuel—Excluded from general state revenues. (Expires July 1, 2028.)

(1) The purpose of eliminating a portion of the sales tax exemption under RCW 82.08.0261 for liquefied natural gas sold for use as a marine vessel transportation fuel is to support the Washington state ferries and other state highway system needs. For this reason, general state revenues transferred under RCW 82.32.860 to the motor vehicle fund are excluded from the calculation of general state revenues for purposes of Article VIII, section 1 of the state Constitution and RCW 39.42.130 and 39.42.140.

(2) This section expires July 1, 2028.

[ 2014 c 216 s 408.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Tax preference performance statement—2014 c 216: See notes following RCW 82.38.030.